Louisiana, session 2026, HB762.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:8(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§8. Final delinquent debt; office of motor vehicles
* * *
B. The office of motor vehicles may refer a final delinquent debt for which
a debtor has not entered into an installment agreement for payment to the office of
debt recovery as provided in R.S. 47:1676, except for debts incurred pursuant to R.S.
32:863(A)(3)(a). Final delinquent debt referrals shall include data and information
in the required format necessary to institute collection procedures. All delinquent
debts shall be authenticated by the office of motor vehicles prior to being referred
to the office of debt recovery. Once the delinquent debt becomes final and prior to
referral to the office of debt recovery, the office of motor vehicles shall notify the
debtor in writing that failure to pay the debt in full within sixty days shall subject the
debt to the amount owed, as specified in R.S. 32:57.1(B), 863(A)(3)(a), and 863.1,
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 762 ENROLLED
together with the additional fee collected by the office of debt recovery provided for
in R.S. 47:1676. Such notice shall also inform the debtor that the debtor may qualify
to pay sums due by installment agreement, if eligible, and shall include instructions
on how to inquire with the office of motor vehicles to determine eligibility and
terms.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 47:1676(C)(2)(a)(i) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§1676. Debt Recovery
* * *
C.
* * *
(2)(a)(i) Agencies that do not have collection contracts with the attorney
general's office for the collection of delinquent debts shall refer all delinquent debts
to the office as provided by rule. However, notwithstanding any provision of this
Section to the contrary, debts incurred pursuant to R.S. 32:863(A)(3)(a) may be
referred to the office at the discretion of the office of motor vehicles. Such referrals
shall include data and information in the required format necessary as provided for
in Item (ii) of this Subparagraph to institute collection procedures. All delinquent
debts shall be authenticated by the agency or officer prior to being referred to the
office. Once the debt becomes final, and prior to referral to the office, the agency
shall notify the debtor that failure to pay the debt in full within sixty days shall
subject the debt to an additional collection fee as provided for in this Section. All
agencies shall refer nonfinal delinquent debts to the attorney general's office for
collection when the debt has been delinquent for sixty days pursuant to the referral
guidelines established by the attorney general as incorporated into agreements
between the attorney general and other agencies or pursuant to the rules promulgated
by the attorney general pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act. Such nonfinal
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 762 ENROLLED
delinquent debts shall be authenticated by the agency prior to their referral to the
attorney general.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.